Maryland, session 2026, HB0037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
2–105.
(A) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “RESPONSIBILITIES AS A MEMBER OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY” DOES NOT INCLUDE CAMPAIGNING ON BEHALF OF THE
MEMBER OR ANOTHER CANDIDATE FOR ELECTED OFFICE.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY IS IN SESSION.
(3) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0037*

HOUSE BILL 37
(I) DEPRIVE AN EMPLOYEE WHO IS A MEMBER OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF EMPLOYMENT OR COERCE, INTIMIDATE, OR THREATEN TO
DISCHARGE AN INDIVIDUAL BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL:
1. LOSES EMPLOYMENT TIME TO PERFORMING
RESPONSIBILITIES AS A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; OR
2. EXERCISES A RIGHT TO REFRAIN FROM WORK UNDER
ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH;
(II) REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL WHO SPENT AT LEAST 4 HOURS,
INCLUDING TRAVELING TIME, TO PERFORM RESPONSIBILITIES AS A MEMBER OF
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO WORK AN EMPLOYMENT SHIFT THAT BEGINS:
1. ON OR AFTER 5 P.M. ON THE DAY OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S
RESPONSIBILITIES AS A MEMBER; OR
2. BEFORE 3 A.M. ON THE DAY FOLLOWING THE
INDIVIDUAL’S RESPONSIBILITIES AS A MEMBER; OR
(III) REQUIRE AN EMPLOYEE WHO IS A MEMBER OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO USE THE EMPLOYEE’S ANNUAL, SICK, OR VACATION LEAVE
TO PERFORM RESPONSIBILITIES AS A MEMBER.
(4) AN EMPLOYER WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000.
(B) While the General Assembly is in session, IN ADDITION TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, each member or employee of
the General Assembly who also is employed by the State or any of its political subdivisions:
(1) is entitled automatically to a leave of absence from the other
employment; and
(2) except for a right to a salary or wages, may not be deprived of or
otherwise have impaired any incident of the employment, including tenure, seniority,
annual or sick leave, promotional rights, or rights to salary increments.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.